Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 5 Aid to Families With Dependent Children

49-4-100 through 49-4-119.
[Reserved]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 5, effective April 22, 1997.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 5, effective April 22, 1997, repealed and reserved this article. This article was based on Ga. L. 1937, p. 630, §§ 1, 2, 4, 5, 11, 13, and 14; Ga. L. 1950, p. 307, § 1; Ga. L. 1952, p. 253, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 368, § 5; Ga. L. 1963, p. 291, §§ 1 - 3; Ga. L. 1964, p. 125, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 49; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1426, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 410, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 881, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1720, § 15; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 49; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2772, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3044, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1969, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 49; Ga. L. 1994, p. 765, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1155, §§ 2, 2.1.

Code Sections 49-4-118 and 49-4-119, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 1155, §§ 2 and 2.1, respectively, were repealed by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 5 prior to their effective dates.